Massachusetts, session 194th, S775.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Subsection (a) of section 11 of chapter 176J of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting at the end thereof the following:- 
The commissioner may also exempt carriers from complying with this section based on 
(i) whether the majority of a carrier’s chapter 176J membership is enrolled in a single rate 
region; or (ii) whether the majority of the carrier’s chapter 176J membership is enrolled in 
subsidized coverage offered under chapter 176Q through which such members receive state or 
federal subsidies; or (iii) whether the carrier receives 80 per cent or more of its income from 
government programs, including subsidized coverage offered under chapter 176Q through which 
such members receive state or federal subsidies. 
SECTION 2. Section 9A of chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 

of 2 12  "(a)(i) limits the ability of the carrier to introduce or modify a select network plan or 
tiered network plan by granting the health care provider a guaranteed right of participation; (ii) 
requires the carrier to place all members of a provider group, whether local practice groups or 
facilities, in the same tier of a tiered network plan; or (iii) requires the carrier to include all 
members of a provider group, whether local practice groups or facilities, in a select network plan 
on an all-or-nothing basis; or".